Wisconsin, session 2025, SB84.
do enact as follows:SB84,1Section 1. 77.25 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:77.25 (8) Between parent and child, stepparent and stepchild, parent and son-in-law or, parent and daughter-in-law, or grandparent and grandchild for nominal or no consideration.SB84,2Section 2. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to conveyances filed on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb84 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb84 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB84 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB84 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB84: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting